Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 476 Y 205
SFX 476    0       ri      .
SFX 476    0       etako/692      .
SFX 476    0       ren/703      .
SFX 476    0       txoentzat      .
SFX 476    0       aren/703      .
SFX 476    0       eko/692      .
SFX 476    0       a      .
SFX 476    0       k      .
SFX 476    0       tako/692      .
SFX 476    0       on/705      .
SFX 476    0       otarik      .
SFX 476    0       en/703      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrarentzat      .
SFX 476    0       agoarendako      .
SFX 476    0       etik      .
SFX 476    0       txoak      .
SFX 476    0       txoan      .
SFX 476    0       txoaz      .
SFX 476    0       agookin      .
SFX 476    0       tariko      .
SFX 476    0       tarantz      .
SFX 476    0       agoarekin      .
SFX 476    0       txoei      .
SFX 476    0       txoek      .
SFX 476    0       txoen      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrari      .
SFX 476    0       txoez      .
SFX 476    0       txoarekin      .
SFX 476    0       agorentzat      .
SFX 476    0       agoaren      .
SFX 476    0       txotik      .
SFX 476    0       tzargatik      .
SFX 476    0       eranzko      .
SFX 476    0       etarat      .
SFX 476    0       okin      .
SFX 476    0       txoko      .
SFX 476    0       arekiko      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrentzat      .
SFX 476    0       tarago      .
SFX 476    0       tzarretik      .
SFX 476    0       erantzago      .
SFX 476    0       txooi      .
SFX 476    0       txook      .
SFX 476    0       txoon      .
SFX 476    0       txooz      .
SFX 476    0       rik      .
SFX 476    0       etarik      .
SFX 476    0       txora      .
SFX 476    0       agorekin      .
SFX 476    0       txori      .
SFX 476    0       tarako      .
SFX 476    0       ean      .
SFX 476    0       otatik      .
SFX 476    0       ekiko      .
SFX 476    0       txorekin      .
SFX 476    0       gatik      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrokin      .
SFX 476    0       txootaz      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrarekin      .
SFX 476    0       otako      .
SFX 476    0       txoarendako      .
SFX 476    0       tarantzago      .
SFX 476    0       tzarraren      .
SFX 476    0       txoekin      .
SFX 476    0       tarat      .
SFX 476    0       txorendako      .
SFX 476    0       otara      .
SFX 476    0       tan      .
SFX 476    0       arekin      .
SFX 476    0       agandik      .
SFX 476    0       era      .
SFX 476    0       tatiko      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrean      .
SFX 476    0       agoak      .
SFX 476    0       agoan      .
SFX 476    0       agoaz      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrak      .
SFX 476    0       tzarraz      .
SFX 476    0       tarik      .
SFX 476    0       agoendako      .
SFX 476    0       etatik      .
SFX 476    0       agoei      .
SFX 476    0       agoek      .
SFX 476    0       txoendako      .
SFX 476    0       agoen      .
SFX 476    0       agoez      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrei      .
SFX 476    0       agoraino      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrek      .
SFX 476    0       tzarren      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrez      .
SFX 476    0       agoari      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrik      .
SFX 476    0       tzartzat      .
SFX 476    0       txoraino      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrarendako      .
SFX 476    0       agootaz      .
SFX 476    0       erako      .
SFX 476    0       aganaino      .
SFX 476    0       tzarreko      .
SFX 476    0       etaranzko      .
SFX 476    0       agoko      .
SFX 476    0       agan      .
SFX 476    0       taranzko      .
SFX 476    0       etarantzago      .
SFX 476    0       etaraino      .
SFX 476    0       agooi      .
SFX 476    0       agook      .
SFX 476    0       agoon      .
SFX 476    0       agooz      .
SFX 476    0       tzarroi      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrok      .
SFX 476    0       tzarron      .
SFX 476    0       tzarroz      .
SFX 476    0       agoekin      .
SFX 476    0       agorantz      .
SFX 476    0       rago      .
SFX 476    0       regatik      .
SFX 476    0       agorendako      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrera      .
SFX 476    0       agora      .
SFX 476    0       agori      .
SFX 476    0       txo      .
SFX 476    0       otan      .
SFX 476    0       otaz      .
SFX 476    0       txorantz      .
SFX 476    0       aganantz      .
SFX 476    0       etariko      .
SFX 476    0       erainoko      .
SFX 476    0       etarantz      .
SFX 476    0       ekin      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrendako      .
SFX 476    0       agoa      .
SFX 476    0       agok      .
SFX 476    0       agoz      .
SFX 476    0       tatik      .
SFX 476    0       erantzegi      .
SFX 476    0       agogatik      .
SFX 476    0       rekiko      .
SFX 476    0       agorat      .
SFX 476    0       agoarentzat      .
SFX 476    0       txogatik      .
SFX 476    0       txoari      .
SFX 476    0       agoren      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrotaz      .
SFX 476    0       etarago      .
SFX 476    0       txotzat      .
SFX 476    0       agorik      .
SFX 476    0       tzarra      .
SFX 476    0       tzarri      .
SFX 476    0       otaraino      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrekin      .
SFX 476    0       tiko      .
SFX 476    0       etarako      .
SFX 476    0       ezko      .
SFX 476    0       tarantzegi      .
SFX 476    0       okiko      .
SFX 476    0       agatik      .
SFX 476    0       erat      .
SFX 476    0       otarantz      .
SFX 476    0       agoontzat      .
SFX 476    0       tzarreraino      .
SFX 476    0       gatiko      .
SFX 476    0       txoontzat      .
SFX 476    0       txorat      .
SFX 476    0       etara      .
SFX 476    0       ago      .
SFX 476    0       ak      .
SFX 476    0       az      .
SFX 476    0       rekin      .
SFX 476    0       txoa      .
SFX 476    0       txok      .
SFX 476    0       txoz      .
SFX 476    0       txoren      .
SFX 476    0       txookin      .
SFX 476    0       txoarentzat      .
SFX 476    0       etarainoko      .
SFX 476    0       eraino      .
SFX 476    0       ei      .
SFX 476    0       ek      .
SFX 476    0       agotzat      .
SFX 476    0       ez      .
SFX 476    0       etatiko      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrerat      .
SFX 476    0       txorik      .
SFX 476    0       agotik      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrerantz      .
SFX 476    0       tara      .
SFX 476    0       txorentzat      .
SFX 476    0       etarantzegi      .
SFX 476    0       txoaren      .
SFX 476    0       ari      .
SFX 476    0       otarat      .
SFX 476    0       tzar      .
SFX 476    0       tzat      .
SFX 476    0       erantz      .
SFX 476    0       oi      .
SFX 476    0       ok      .
SFX 476    0       oz      .
SFX 476    0       tarainoko      .
SFX 476    0       taraino      .
SFX 476    0       agana      .
SFX 476    0       etan      .
SFX 476    0       agoentzat      .
SFX 476    0       tzarrontzat      .
